Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2252.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 21.1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2231, to read: START_STATUTE36-2231. Ground ambulances; certified nurse midwives; certified professional midwives; licensed midwives If a certified nurse midwife, certified professional midwife or licensed midwife requests an ambulance during an out-of-hospital birth by dialing 911 or a similarly designated telephone number for emergency calls, the certified nurse midwife, certified professional midwife or licensed midwife may accompany the patient in the ground ambulance to the hospital and may continue to provide necessary medical care during transport if approved by the medical director providing administrative medical direction. END_STATUTE